Hawaii, session 2026, HB2472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that salaries for management professionals in the private sector far outpace those offered in state employment, making it difficult to attract and retain quality upper management staff.  The legislature further finds that in order for the board of trustees of the Hawaii employer‑union health benefits trust fund to recruit and retain the most qualified individuals, the board should be allowed to establish appropriate salaries for upper management staff. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the board of trustees of the Hawaii employer-union health benefits trust fund to establish the salary for the trust fund assistant administrator; provided that the board shall first conduct a market analysis of commensurate salaries in the private sector. SECTION 2.  Section 87A-24, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§87A-24 Other powers.  In addition to the power to administer the fund, the board may: (1)  Collect, receive, deposit, and withdraw money on behalf of the fund; (2)  Invest moneys in the same manner specified in section 88-119; (3)  Hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer, or dispose of any securities or other investments of the fund, as well as the proceeds of those investments and any money belonging to the fund; (4)  Appoint, and at pleasure dismiss, an administrator and other fund staff.  The administrator shall be exempt from chapter 76.  Other fund staff may be exempt from chapter 76 as determined by the board.  The administrator and staff who are exempt from chapter 76 shall serve under and at the pleasure of the board; provided that civil service exempt positions under this section that are created after July 1, 2014, shall be exempt from section 76-16(b)(17)(A); provided further that the salaries of the administrator, assistant administrator, and chief investment officer shall be set by the board; provided further that before the board sets the salary of the assistant administrator, the board shall first conduct a market analysis of commensurate salaries in the private sector; (5)  Make payments of periodic charges and pay for reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out the purposes of the fund; (6)  Contract for the performance of financial audits of the fund and claims audits of its insurance carriers; (7)  Retain auditors, actuaries, investment firms and managers, benefit plan consultants, or other professional advisors to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including the retaining of an actuary to determine the annual required public employer contribution for the separate trust fund established under section 87A-42; (8)  Establish health benefits plan and long-term care benefits plan rates that include administrative and other expenses necessary to effectuate the purposes of the fund; and (9)  Require any department, agency, or employee of the State or counties to furnish information to the board to carry out the purposes of this chapter." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.